src/punct-deu-lex.txt
! ================= !
! Punctuation marks !
! ================= !


LEXICON Punctuation


! Clause boundary symbols

%,+CLB:%,           # ;
%.+CLB:%.           # ;
%.%.+CLB:%.%.       # ;
%.%.%.+CLB:%.%.%.   # ;
%:+CLB:%:           # ;
%;+CLB:%;	        # ;
^excl+CLB:%!	    # ;	!^C^
%?+CLB:%?	        # ;
É+CLB:É		        # ;
À+CLB:À		        # ;	! Only seen as noise.
¦+CLB:¦		        # ;	

¥+PUNCT:¥	        # ;
-+PUNCT:-           # ; !hyphen
--+PUNCT:--         # ; !double hyphen
Ð+PUNCT:Ð           # ; !endash
Ñ+PUNCT:Ñ           # ; !emdash
=+PUNCT:=           # ;
%%+PUNCT:%%         # ;
&+PUNCT:&           # ;
%"+PUNCT:%"         # ;
'+PUNCT:'           # ;
%*+PUNCT:%*         # ;
++PUNCT:+           # ;
`+PUNCT:`           # ;
«+PUNCT:«           # ;
/+PUNCT:/           # ; 
+/-+PUNCT:+/-       # ;
%~+PUNCT:%~	        # ;


! Paired punctuation marks

%Ç+PUNCT+LEFT:%Ç    # ;
%È+PUNCT+RIGHT:%È   # ;
%Ò+PUNCT+LEFT:%Ò    # ;
%Ó+PUNCT+RIGHT:%Ó   # ;
%Ô+PUNCT+LEFT:%Ô    # ;
%Õ+PUNCT+RIGHT:%Õ   # ;
%Ü+PUNCT+LEFT:%Ü    # ;
%Ý+PUNCT+RIGHT:%Ý   # ;
%(+PUNCT+LEFT:%(    # ;
%)+PUNCT+RIGHT:%)   # ;
%[+PUNCT+LEFT:%[    # ;
%]+PUNCT+RIGHT:%]   # ;
%{+PUNCT+LEFT:%{    # ;
%}+PUNCT+RIGHT:%}   # ;
%<+PUNCT+LEFT:%<    # ;
%>+PUNCT+LEFT:%>    # ;
